California statutes. Elections Code
(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

A local government shall not enact or enforce any charter provision, ordinance, or regulation requiring a person to present identification for the purpose of voting or submitting a ballot at any polling place, vote center, or other location where ballots are cast or submitted, unless required by state or federal law. For the purpose of this section, “local government” means any charter or general law city, charter or general law county, or any city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 990, Sec. 2.   (SB 1174)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. District Boundaries [10010. - 10010.]

10010.

(a) A political subdivision that changes from an at-large method of election to a district-based election, or that establishes district-based elections, shall do all of the following before a public hearing at which the governing body of the political subdivision votes to approve or defeat an ordinance establishing district-based elections:

(1) Before drawing a draft map or maps of the proposed boundaries of the districts, the political subdivision shall hold at least two public hearings over a period of no more than 30 days, at which the public is invited to provide input regarding the composition of the districts. Before these hearings, the political subdivision may conduct outreach to the public, including to non-English-speaking communities, to explain the
 districting process and to encourage public participation.

(2) After all draft maps are drawn, the political subdivision shall publish and make available for release at least one draft map and, if members of the governing body of the political subdivision will be elected in their districts at different times to provide for staggered terms of office, the potential sequence of the elections. The political subdivision shall also hold at least two additional hearings over a period of no more than 45 days, at which the public is invited to provide input regarding the content of the draft map or maps and the proposed sequence of elections, if applicable. The first version of a draft map shall be published at least seven days before consideration at a hearing. If a draft map is revised at or following a hearing, it shall be published and made available to the public for at least seven days before being adopted.

(3) If a public hearing held pursuant to this section is consolidated with a regular or special meeting of the governing body of the political subdivision that includes other substantive agenda items, the public hearing shall begin at a fixed time regardless of its order on the agenda, except that the governing body of the political subdivision may first conclude any item being discussed or acted upon, including any associated public comment, when that time occurs. The governing body shall provide notice of the public hearing to the public.

(b) In determining the final sequence of the district elections conducted in a political subdivision in which members of the governing body will be elected at different times to provide for staggered terms of office, the governing body shall give special consideration to the purposes of the California Voting Rights Act of
 2001, and it shall take into account the preferences expressed by members of the districts.

(c) This section applies to, but is not limited to, a proposal that is required due to a court-imposed change from an at-large method of election to a district-based election.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “At-large method of election” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 14026.

(2) “District-based election” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14026.

(3) “Political subdivision” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 14026.

(e) (1) Before commencing an action to enforce Sections 14027 and 14028, a prospective plaintiff shall send by certified mail a written notice to the clerk of the political subdivision against which the action would be brought asserting that the political subdivision’s method of conducting elections may violate the California Voting Rights Act of 2001.

(2) A prospective plaintiff shall not commence an action to enforce Sections 14027 and 14028 within 45 days of the political subdivision’s receipt of the written notice described in paragraph (1).

(3) (A) Before receiving a written notice described in paragraph (1), or within 45 days of receipt of a notice, a political subdivision may pass a resolution outlining its intention to transition from at-large to district-based elections,
 specific steps it will undertake to facilitate this transition, and an estimated timeframe for doing so.

(B) If a political subdivision passes a resolution pursuant to subparagraph (A), a prospective plaintiff shall not commence an action to enforce Sections 14027 and 14028 within 90 days of the resolution’s passage.

(C) (i) A political subdivision and the prospective plaintiff who first sends a notice pursuant to paragraph (1) may enter into a written agreement to extend the time period described in subparagraph (B) for up to an additional 90 days in order to provide additional time to conduct public outreach, encourage public participation, and receive public input. The written agreement shall include a requirement that the district boundaries be established no later than six months before the political subdivision’s next regular election to select
 governing board members. However, in a political subdivision that holds a primary election as part of its process for selecting governing board members, the written agreement shall include a requirement that district boundaries be established no later than six months before the political subdivision’s next regular primary election.

(ii) No later than 10 days after a political subdivision enters into a written agreement pursuant to clause (i), the political subdivision shall prepare and make available on its internet website a tentative schedule of the public outreach events and the public hearings held pursuant to this section. If a political subdivision does not maintain an internet website, the political subdivision shall make the tentative schedule available to the public upon request.

(f) (1) If a political subdivision adopts an ordinance establishing
 district-based elections pursuant to subdivision (a), a prospective plaintiff who sent a written notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) before the political subdivision passed its resolution of intention may, within 30 days of the ordinance’s adoption, demand reimbursement for the cost of the work product generated to support the notice. A prospective plaintiff shall make the demand in writing and shall substantiate the demand with financial documentation, such as a detailed invoice for demography services. A political subdivision may request additional documentation if the provided documentation is insufficient to corroborate the claimed costs. A political subdivision shall reimburse a prospective plaintiff for reasonable costs claimed, or in an amount to which the parties mutually agree, within 45 days of receiving the written demand, except as provided in paragraph (2). In all cases, the amount of the reimbursement shall not exceed the cap described in paragraph (3).

(2) If more than one prospective plaintiff is entitled to reimbursement, the political subdivision shall reimburse the prospective plaintiffs in the order in which they sent a written notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), and the 45-day time period described in paragraph (1) shall apply only to reimbursement of the first prospective plaintiff who sent a written notice. The cumulative amount of reimbursements to all prospective plaintiffs shall not exceed the cap described in paragraph (3).

(3) The amount of reimbursement required by this section is capped at thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), as adjusted annually to the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, United States city average, as published by the United States Department of Labor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.   (AB 453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. MUNICIPAL ELECTIONS [10100. - 10312.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10100. - 10104.]

10100.

Whenever the county elections official is required to examine the signatures upon any nomination paper or petition of any candidate for a municipal office, he or she may employ necessary help for the examination. The cost shall be paid by the city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10101.

This part shall apply to all municipal elections, except where otherwise provided for in the Constitution of the state, or in a charter duly adopted or amended pursuant to the Constitution of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10102.

Section 13107, relating to ballot designations, shall apply to municipal elections, whether held in a general law or chartered city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.

Part 3 (commencing with Section 8600) of Division 8 and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15350) of Division 15, relating to write-in votes, shall apply to municipal elections held in general law cities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10104.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 15, if the last day for the performance of any act provided for or required by this code is a day when the elections official’s office is closed pursuant to a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body, the act may be performed upon the next business day with the same effect as if it had been performed upon the day appointed.

(b) This section is not applicable when the election is consolidated with another election pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 371, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Regulations Governing Elections in Cities [10200. - 10266.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [10200. - 10201.]

10200.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to promote its objects, and no error, omission or irregularity shall invalidate an election if there has been a substantial compliance with this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10201.

A proposition may be submitted at a regular election, or a special election may be called, by ordinance or resolution, for the purpose of voting on a proposition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.2. The Congressional Term Limits Act [10204.1. - 10204.11.]

10204.1.

It is the official position of the People of the State of California that our elected officials should vote to enact, by amendment to the U.S. Constitution, congressional term limits which are not longer than three terms in the U.S. House of Representatives, nor two terms in the U.S. Senate.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.2.

It is the will of the People of the State of California that application be made to Congress on behalf of the People of California and the California Legislature that Congress adopt the following amendment to the U.S. Constitution: 

Congressional Term Limits Amendment

Section A.No person may serve in the office of U.S. Representative for more
 than three terms, but upon ratification of the Term Limits Amendment no person who has held the office of U.S. Representative or who then holds the office may serve for more than two additional terms. 

Section B.No person may serve in the office of U.S. Senator for more than two terms, but upon ratification of the Term Limits Amendment no person who has held the office of U.S. Senator or who then holds the office may serve more than one additional term. 

Section C.This article shall have no time limit within which it must be ratified by the legislatures of three-fourths of the several states.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.3.

The California Legislature, due to the desire of the People of the State of California to establish term limits on the Congress of the United States, is hereby instructed to make the following application to Congress, pursuant to its power under Article V of the U.S. Constitution: 

“We, the People and Legislature of the State of California, due to our desire to establish term limits on the Congress of
 the United States, hereby make application to Congress, pursuant to our power under Article V of the U.S. Constitution, to call a convention for proposing amendments to the Constitution.”

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.4.

Each state legislator is hereby instructed to use all of his or her delegated powers to pass the Article V application to Congress set forth in Section 10204.3, and to ratify, if proposed by Congress, the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.5.

(a) As provided in this act, at each election for the office of United States Representative, United States Senator, State Senator, or Member of the Assembly, the ballot shall inform voters regarding any incumbent or nonincumbent candidate’s failure to support the above proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment. 

(b) All primary, general, and special
 election ballots shall have the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” printed adjacent to the name of any State Senator or Member of the Assembly who during the regular legislative session following the most recent general election: 

(1) Failed to vote in favor of the application set forth in Section 10204.3 when brought to a vote; or 

(2) Failed to second the application set forth in Section 10204.3 if it lacked for a second; or 

(3) Failed to vote in favor of all votes bringing the application set forth in Section 10204.3 before any committee or subcommittee upon which he or she served in the respective houses; or 

(4) Failed to propose or otherwise bring to a vote of the full legislative body the application set forth in
 Section 10204.3 if it otherwise lacked a legislator who so proposed or brought to a vote of the full legislative body the application set forth above; or 

(5) Failed to vote against any attempt to delay, table, or otherwise prevent a vote by the full legislative body of the application set forth in Section 10204.3; or 

(6) Failed in any way to ensure that all votes on the application set forth in Section 10204.3 were recorded and made available to the public; or 

(7) Failed to vote against any change, addition, or modification to the application set forth in Section 10204.3; or 

(8) Failed to vote in favor of the amendment set forth in Section 10204.2 if it was sent to the states for ratification; or 

(9) Failed to vote against any term limits amendment other than the proposed amendment set forth in Section 10204.2, if such an amendment was sent to the states for ratification. 

(c) The information “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” as required by any of paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (b) shall not appear adjacent to the names of candidates for the State Senate or Assembly if the State of California has made the application to Congress for a convention for proposing amendments to the U.S. Constitution pursuant to this article and such application has not been withdrawn. 

(d) The information “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” as required by either of paragraphs (8) and (9) of subdivision (b), shall not appear adjacent to the names of candidates for the State Senate or Assembly if the Congressional Term Limits Amendment
 set forth in Section 10204.2 has been submitted to the states for ratification and ratified by the California Legislature, or the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2 has become part of the U.S. Constitution.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.6.

Each member of the California congressional delegation is hereby instructed to use all of his or her delegated powers to pass the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.7.

All primary, general, and special election ballots shall have the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” printed adjacent to the name of any U.S. Representative or U.S. Senator who during the first 12 months of the regular legislative session following the most recent general election: 

(a) Failed to vote in favor of the proposed Congressional Term Limits
 Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2 when brought to a vote; or 

(b) Failed to second the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2 if it lacked for a second before any proceeding of the legislative body; or 

(c) Failed to propose or otherwise bring to a vote of the full legislative body the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2 if it otherwise lacked a legislator who so proposed or brought to a vote of the full legislative body the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2; or 

(d) Failed to vote in favor of all votes bringing the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2 before any committee or subcommittee upon which he or she served in the respective houses; or 

(e) Failed to vote against or reject any attempt to delay, table, or otherwise prevent a vote by the full legislative body of the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2; or 

(f) Failed to vote against any term limits proposal other than the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2; or 

(g) Sponsored or co-sponsored any proposed Constitutional amendment or law that proposes term limits other than those in the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2; or 

(h) Failed to ensure that all votes on the proposed Constitutional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2 were recorded and made available to the public.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.8.

The information “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” may not appear adjacent to the names of a candidate for Congress if the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2 is before the states for ratification or has become part of the U.S. Constitution.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.9.

Notwithstanding any other provision of California law,

(a) A nonincumbent candidate for the office of U.S. Representative and U.S. Senator, State Senator, or Member of the Assembly shall be permitted to sign a ‛Term Limits Pledge‛ each time he or she files as a candidate for such an office. A candidate who declines to sign the “Term Limits Pledge” shall have “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO
 SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” printed adjacent to his or her name on the election ballot. 

(b) Each time a nonincumbent candidate for U.S. Senator, U.S. Representative, State Senator, or Member of the Assembly files for candidacy, he or she shall be offered the “Term Limits Pledge,” until such time as the U.S. Constitution has been amended to limit U.S. Senators to two terms in office and U.S. Representatives to three terms in office. 

(c) The “Term Limits Pledge” that each nonincumbent candidate set forth above shall be offered is as follows: 

“I support congressional term limits and pledge to use all of my legislative powers to enact the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in the Congressional Term Limits Act. If elected, I pledge to act and vote in such a way that the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM
 LIMITS‛ will not appear next to my name.” 

The pledge form will provide a space for the signature of the candidate and the date signed. 

(d) The Secretary of State shall be responsible to make an accurate determination as to whether a candidate for the state or federal legislature shall have placed adjacent to his or her name on the election ballot “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” or “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS.” 

(e) The Secretary of State shall consider timely submitted public comments prior to making the determination required in subdivision (d). 

(f) The Secretary of State, in accordance with subdivision (d) shall determine and declare what information, if any, shall appear adjacent to the names of each incumbent state and federal
 legislator if he or she is to be a candidate in the next general election. In the case of U.S. Representatives and U.S. Senators, this determination and declaration shall be made not later than 13 months after a new Congress has been convened, and shall be based upon Congressional action in the first 12 months of the regular session following the most recent general election. In the case of incumbent state legislators, this determination and declaration shall be made not later than 13 months after a new Legislature has been convened, and shall be based upon state congressional action in the first 12 months of the regular session following the most recent general election. 

(g) The Secretary of State shall determine and declare what information, if any, will appear adjacent to the names of nonincumbent candidates for Congress and the California Legislature, not later than five days after the deadline for filing for the office. 

(h) If the Secretary of State makes the determination that “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” or “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” may not be placed on the ballot adjacent to the name of a candidate for senator or representative for state or federal office, any elector shall appeal such decision within five days to the California Supreme Court as an original action or waive any right to appeal such decision; in which case the burden of proof shall be upon the Secretary of State to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the candidate has met the requirements set forth in this article and therefore should not have the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” or “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” printed on the ballot adjacent to the candidate’s name. 

(i) If the Secretary of State determines that “DISREGARDED VOTERS’
 INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” or “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” shall be placed on the ballot adjacent to a candidate’s name, the candidate shall appeal such decision within five days to the California Supreme Court as an original action or waive any right to appeal such decision; in which case the burden of proof shall be upon the candidate to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that he or she should not have the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS’ INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” or “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” printed on the ballot adjacent to the candidate’s name. 

(j) The Supreme Court shall hear the appeal provided for in subdivision (h) and issue a decision within 120 days. The Supreme Court shall hear the appeal provided for in subdivision (i) and issue a decision not later than 61 days before the date of the election.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.10.

At such time as the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in Section 10204.2 has become part of the U.S. Constitution, this article automatically shall be repealed.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 1.2, comprising Sections 10204.1 to 10204.11.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.11.

Severability. If any portion, clause, or phrase of this act is for any reason held to be invalid or unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining portions, clauses, and phrases shall not be affected, but shall remain in full force and effect. The portions of this act shall supersede all inconsistent provisions of state law.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 225.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 10204.10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Nomination of Candidates [10220. - 10230.]

10220.

Candidates may be nominated for any of the elective offices of the city in the following manner:

Not earlier than the 113th day nor later than the 88th day before a municipal election during normal office hours, as posted, the voters may nominate candidates for election by signing a nomination paper. Each candidate shall be proposed by not less than 20 nor more than 30 voters in a city of 1,000 registered voters or more, and not less than five nor more than 10 voters in a city of less than 1,000 registered voters, but only one candidate may be named in any one nomination paper. No voter may sign more than one nomination paper for the same office, and in the event the voter does so, that
 voter’s signature shall count only on the first nomination paper filed which contains the voter’s signature. Nomination papers subsequently filed and containing that voter’s signature shall be considered as though that signature does not appear thereon. Each seat on the governing body is a separate office. Any person who meets the requirements of Section 102 may circulate a nomination paper. Only one person may circulate each nomination paper. Where there are full terms and short terms to be filled, the term shall be specified in the nomination paper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 25.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10220.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a candidate shall not file nomination papers for more than one municipal office or term of office for the same municipality in the same election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 508, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10221.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the signatures to each nomination paper shall be appended on the same sheet of paper, and each signer shall add his or her place of residence, giving the street and number, if any, or another designation of his or her place of residence, so as to enable its location to be readily ascertained.

(b) Once a nomination paper is filed with the elections official, the nomination paper may not be returned to the candidate to obtain additional
 signatures. If the nomination paper is determined to be insufficient or the candidate fails to obtain the correct number of valid signatures on his or her nomination paper, the elections official shall retain the original nomination paper, provide a copy of the nomination paper to the candidate with an indication on of which signatures are valid, and issue one supplemental petition to the candidate on which the candidate may collect additional signatures. The supplemental petition shall be filed not later than the last day for filing for that office. The form of the supplemental petition shall be the same as the nomination paper, except that the word “Supplemental” shall be inserted above the phrase “Nomination Paper.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 785, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10222.

Every nomination paper shall have annexed an affidavit of the person who circulated it, to the effect that he or she saw written all the signatures appended thereto, and knows that they are the signatures of the persons whose names they purport to be.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10223.

Each nomination paper shall be accompanied by a declaration of candidacy pursuant to Section 10226.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 109, Sec. 6.   (AB 2582)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10224.

All nomination papers shall be filed with the city elections official during regular business hours as posted, not later than the 88th day before the election. Until that time, but not after, a candidate may withdraw his or her nomination paper after it is filed with the elections official as provided in this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10224.5.

No later than three days before the deadline for submission of nomination papers for a municipal election, the city elections official shall post on the city’s internet website, or publish a public notice that includes all of the following:

(a) A list of the offices to be filled.

(b) Whether the city elections official has furnished nomination papers to the incumbent for each open office.

(c) Whether, due to redistricting, there is no eligible incumbent for an open office.

(d) The location where nomination
 papers may be obtained.

(e) The location, dates, and hours of operation of the office where completed nomination papers may be filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 870, Sec. 4.   (SB 386)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10225.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 10220 and 10224, if nomination papers for an incumbent officer of the city are not filed by or on the 88th day before the election, during normal business hours, as posted, or are filed but then are withdrawn before the close of normal business hours on the 88th day before the election, the voters shall have until the 83rd day before the election during normal business hours, as posted, to nominate candidates other than the person who was the incumbent on the 88th day, for that incumbent’s elective office.

(b) This section is not applicable where there is no incumbent eligible to be elected. If this section is
 applicable, notwithstanding Section 10224, a candidate may withdraw their nomination paper until the 83rd day before the election during normal business hours, as posted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 10.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10226.

(a) The nomination paper shall be in substantially the following form:NOMINATION PAPERI, the undersigned signer for ______ for nomination to the office of ____, to be voted for at the municipal election to be held on the ____ day of ____, 20__, hereby assert as follows:I am a resident of the municipality of ____ and registered to vote at the address shown on this
 paper. I am not at this time a signer of any other nomination paper of any other candidate for the above-named office, or in case there are several places to be filled in the above-named office, I have not signed more nomination papers than there are places to be filled in the above-named office. My residence is correctly set forth after my signature hereto:Name Residence (b) The affidavit of the circulator shall read as follows:AFFIDAVIT OF THE CIRCULATORI, ______, solemnly swear (or affirm) all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street and number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
.]3.That the signatures on this section of the nomination paper were obtained between _____, 20__, and _____, 20__; that I circulated the petition and I witnessed the signatures on this section of the nomination paper being written; and that, to the best of my information and belief, each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be.Signed Subscribed and sworn to before me this ___________ day of _____________, 20__.(SEAL)Notary Public (or other official) Examined and certified by me this ___________ day of _____________, 20__. Elections OfficialWARNING: Every person acting on behalf of a candidate is guilty of a misdemeanor who deliberately fails to file at the proper time and in the proper place any nomination paper in the person’s possession which is entitled to be filed under Section 18202 of the Elections
 Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 109, Sec. 8.   (AB 2582)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10226.3.

(a) The declaration of candidacy by a candidate shall be substantially as follows:DECLARATION OF CANDIDACYI hereby declare myself a candidate for nomination to the office of ________ District Number ________ to be voted for at the municipal election to be held ________, 20__, and declare the following to be true:My name is .I want my name and occupational designation to appear on the ballot as follows: ______________________________________.Addresses:Residence Business Mailing Telephone numbers: Day _________ Evening _________Internet website:_______________________________________I meet the statutory and constitutional qualifications for this office (including, but not limited to, citizenship, and residency).I am at present an incumbent of the following public office(if any) __________.If nominated, I will accept the nomination, and if elected, I will accept the office.Signature of candidateA Notary Public or other officer completing this certificate verifies only the identity of the individual who signed the document to which this certificate is attached, and not the truthfulness, accuracy, or validity of that document.State of California )County of ) ss. )Subscribed and sworn to before me this ___ day of ________, 20____.Signature of Notary Public (or other official)Notary Public SealExamined and certified by me this ________ day of ________, 20____. County Elections OfficialWARNING: Every person acting on behalf of a candidate is guilty of a misdemeanor who deliberately fails to file at the proper time and in the proper place any declaration of candidacy in the person’s possession which is entitled to be
 filed under the provisions of the Elections Code Section 18202.(b) At the discretion of the elections official, a candidate for any office whose voter registration information is confidential under Section 2166, 2166.5, 2166.7, 2166.8, or 2166.9 may withhold the candidate’s residence address from the declaration of candidacy. If a candidate does not state the candidate’s residence address on the declaration of candidacy, the elections official shall verify whether the candidate’s address is within the appropriate political subdivision and add the notation “verified” where appropriate on the declaration.

(c) If a candidate will not be within the State of California within the entire nomination period and is unable to appear before a notary public appointed by the Secretary of State or other state official to complete their declaration of candidacy, the
 candidate may appear before a notary public in another state to complete the declaration of candidacy. The candidate shall attach to their declaration of candidacy a notarial certificate from the out-of-state notary that complies with the law of the notary’s state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   (AB 1392)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10226.5.

The Secretary of State shall establish uniform filing forms for candidates to use when filing nomination papers pursuant to Section 10226 and a declaration of candidacy pursuant to Section 10226.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 109, Sec. 10.   (AB 2582)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10227.

All forms required for nomination and election to all municipal offices shall be furnished only by the city elections official during regular business hours. At the time of issuance of those forms the city elections official shall type in the forms the name of the candidate and the office for which he is a candidate, shall imprint a stamp which reads “Official Filing Form,” and shall affix his or her signature. At the time nomination papers are issued to a candidate, the city elections official shall imprint the date. The forms shall be distributed without charge
 to all candidates applying for them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10228.

A filing fee proportionate to the costs of processing a candidate’s nomination papers or a candidate’s supplemental nomination papers filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10221 as determined by the city council and set by ordinance, but not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25), may be imposed, to be paid upon the filing of the nomination papers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 785, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10229.

(a) If, by the 88th day, during normal business hours as posted, before the day fixed for a regularly scheduled municipal election or the 83rd day before the election, during normal business hours as posted, if an incumbent fails to file or files but then withdraws pursuant to Section 10225, (i) no one or only one person has been nominated for any office that is elected on a citywide basis, or (ii) no one or only one person is nominated to be elected from or by a legislative district, or (iii) in the case of any office or offices to be elected at large, the number of persons who have been nominated for those offices does not exceed the number to be filled at that election; or, if, by the 88th day, during normal business hours as posted, before a
 municipal election to fill any vacancy in office, no one or only one person has been nominated for any elective office to be filled at that election, and the election is subject to Section 36512 of the Government Code, the city elections official shall submit a certificate of these facts to the governing body of the city and inform the governing body of the city that it may, at a regular or special meeting held before the municipal election, adopt one of the following courses of action:

(1) Appoint to the office the person who has been nominated.

(2) Appoint to the office an eligible elector if no one has been nominated.

(3) Hold the election, if either no one or only one person has been nominated. The city elections